utilities/dictionaries/eu_EU-Basque.aff
FLAG num
SFX 188 0 zeneramakiokeen .
SFX 188 0 zeneramakiokeen/1,403 .
SFX 188 0 zeneramakiokee/1,399 .
SFX 188 0 zeneramakioketen .
SFX 188 0 zeneramakioketen/1,403 .
SFX 188 0 zeneramakiokete .
SFX 188 0 zeneramakiokete/1,401 .
SFX 188 0 zeneramakioke .
SFX 188 0 zeneramakioke/1,398 .
SFX 188 0 zeneramakion .
SFX 188 0 zeneramakion/1,403 .
SFX 188 0 zeneramakioten .
SFX 188 0 zeneramakioten/1,403 .
SFX 188 0 zeneramakiote .
SFX 188 0 zeneramakiote/1,399 .
SFX 188 0 zeneramakio .
SFX 188 0 zeneramakio/1,399 .
SFX 188 0 zeneramakit .
SFX 188 0 zeneraman .
SFX 188 0 zeneraman/1,403 .
SFX 188 0 zeneramaten .
SFX 188 0 zeneramaten/1,403 .
SFX 188 0 zeneramate .
SFX 188 0 zeneramate/1,399 .
SFX 188 0 zeneramatzakeen .
SFX 188 0 zeneramatzakeen/1,403 .
SFX 188 0 zeneramatzakee/1,399 .
SFX 188 0 zeneramatzaketen .
SFX 188 0 zeneramatzaketen/1,403 .
SFX 188 0 zeneramatzakete .
SFX 188 0 zeneramatzakete/1,401 .
SFX 188 0 zeneramatzake .
SFX 188 0 zeneramatzake/1,398 .
SFX 188 0 zeneramatzan .
SFX 188 0 zeneramatzan/1,403 .
SFX 188 0 zeneramatzaten .
SFX 188 0 zeneramatzaten/1,403 .
SFX 188 0 zeneramatzate .
SFX 188 0 zeneramatzate/1,399 .
SFX 188 0 zeneramatza .
SFX 188 0 zeneramatza/1,399 .
SFX 188 0 zeneramazkidakeen .
SFX 188 0 zeneramazkidakeen/1,403 .
SFX 188 0 zeneramazkidakee/1,399 .
SFX 188 0 zeneramazkidaketen .
SFX 188 0 zeneramazkidaketen/1,403 .
SFX 188 0 zeneramazkidakete .
SFX 188 0 zeneramazkidakete/1,401 .
SFX 188 0 zeneramazkidake .
SFX 188 0 zeneramazkidake/1,398 .
SFX 188 0 zeneramazkidan .
SFX 188 0 zeneramazkidan/1,403 .
SFX 188 0 zeneramazkidaten .
SFX 188 0 zeneramazkidaten/1,403 .
SFX 188 0 zeneramazkidate .
SFX 188 0 zeneramazkidate/1,399 .
SFX 188 0 zeneramazkida/1,399 .
SFX 188 0 zeneramazkid/1,182 .
SFX 188 0 zeneramazkiekeen .
SFX 188 0 zeneramazkiekeen/1,403 .
SFX 188 0 zeneramazkiekee/1,399 .
SFX 188 0 zeneramazkieketen .
SFX 188 0 zeneramazkieketen/1,403 .
SFX 188 0 zeneramazkiekete .
SFX 188 0 zeneramazkiekete/1,401 .
SFX 188 0 zeneramazkieke .
SFX 188 0 zeneramazkieke/1,398 .
SFX 188 0 zeneramazkien .
SFX 188 0 zeneramazkien/1,403 .
SFX 188 0 zeneramazkieten .
SFX 188 0 zeneramazkieten/1,403 .
SFX 188 0 zeneramazkiete .
SFX 188 0 zeneramazkiete/1,399 .
SFX 188 0 zeneramazkie .
SFX 188 0 zeneramazkie/1,399 .
SFX 188 0 zeneramazkigukeen .
SFX 188 0 zeneramazkigukeen/1,403 .
SFX 188 0 zeneramazkigukee/1,399 .
SFX 188 0 zeneramazkiguketen .
SFX 188 0 zeneramazkiguketen/1,403 .
SFX 188 0 zeneramazkigukete .
SFX 188 0 zeneramazkigukete/1,401 .
SFX 188 0 zeneramazkiguke .
SFX 188 0 zeneramazkiguke/1,398 .
SFX 188 0 zeneramazkigun .
SFX 188 0 zeneramazkigun/1,403 .
SFX 188 0 zeneramazkiguten .
SFX 188 0 zeneramazkiguten/1,403 .
SFX 188 0 zeneramazkigute .
SFX 188 0 zeneramazkigute/1,399 .
SFX 188 0 zeneramazkigu .
SFX 188 0 zeneramazkigu/1,399 .
SFX 188 0 zeneramazkiokeen .
SFX 188 0 zeneramazkiokeen/1,403 .
SFX 188 0 zeneramazkiokee/1,399 .
SFX 188 0 zeneramazkioketen .
SFX 188 0 zeneramazkioketen/1,403 .
SFX 188 0 zeneramazkiokete .
SFX 188 0 zeneramazkiokete/1,401 .
SFX 188 0 zeneramazkioke .
SFX 188 0 zeneramazkioke/1,398 .
SFX 188 0 zeneramazkion .
SFX 188 0 zeneramazkion/1,403 .
SFX 188 0 zeneramazkioten .
SFX 188 0 zeneramazkioten/1,403 .
SFX 188 0 zeneramazkiote .
SFX 188 0 zeneramazkiote/1,399 .
SFX 188 0 zeneramazkio .
SFX 188 0 zeneramazkio/1,399 .
SFX 188 0 zeneramazkit .
SFX 188 0 zenerama .
SFX 188 0 zenerama/1,399 .
SFX 188 0 zeneritzakeen .
SFX 188 0 zeneritzakeen/1,403 .
SFX 188 0 zeneritzakee/1,399 .
SFX 188 0 zeneritzaketen .
SFX 188 0 zeneritzaketen/1,403 .
SFX 188 0 zeneritzakete .
SFX 188 0 zeneritzakete/1,401 .
SFX 188 0 zeneritzak .
SFX 188 0 zeneritzak/1,398 .
SFX 188 0 zeneritza .
SFX 188 0 zeneritza/1,408 .
SFX 188 0 zeneritzekeen .
SFX 188 0 zeneritzekeen/1,403 .
SFX 188 0 zeneritzekee/1,399 .
SFX 188 0 zeneritzeketen .
SFX 188 0 zeneritzeketen/1,403 .
SFX 188 0 zeneritzekete .
SFX 188 0 zeneritzekete/1,401 .
SFX 188 0 zeneritzeke .
SFX 188 0 zeneritzeke/1,398 .
SFX 188 0 zeneritzen .
SFX 188 0 zeneritzen/1,403 .
SFX 188 0 zeneritzeten .
SFX 188 0 zeneritzeten/1,403 .
SFX 188 0 zeneritzete .
SFX 188 0 zeneritzete/1,399 .
SFX 188 0 zeneritze .
SFX 188 0 zeneritze/1,399 .
SFX 188 0 zeneritzokeen .
SFX 188 0 zeneritzokeen/1,403 .
SFX 188 0 zeneritzokee/1,399 .
SFX 188 0 zeneritzoketen .
SFX 188 0 zeneritzoketen/1,403 .
SFX 188 0 zeneritzokete .
SFX 188 0 zeneritzokete/1,401 .
SFX 188 0 zeneritzoke .
SFX 188 0 zeneritzoke/1,398 .
SFX 188 0 zeneritzon .
SFX 188 0 zeneritzon/1,403 .
SFX 188 0 zeneritzoten .
SFX 188 0 zeneritzoten/1,403 .
SFX 188 0 zeneritzote .
SFX 188 0 zeneritzote/1,399 .
SFX 188 0 zeneritzo .
SFX 188 0 zeneritzo/1,399 .
SFX 188 0 zenerizkukeen .
SFX 188 0 zenerizkukeen/1,403 .
SFX 188 0 zenerizkukee/1,399 .
SFX 188 0 zenerizkuketen .
SFX 188 0 zenerizkuketen/1,403 .
SFX 188 0 zenerizkukete .
SFX 188 0 zenerizkukete/1,401 .
SFX 188 0 zenerizkuke .
SFX 188 0 zenerizkuke/1,398 .
SFX 188 0 zenerizkun .
SFX 188 0 zenerizkun/1,403 .
SFX 188 0 zenerizkuten .
SFX 188 0 zenerizkuten/1,403 .
SFX 188 0 zenerizkute .
SFX 188 0 zenerizkute/1,399 .
SFX 188 0 zenerizku .
SFX 188 0 zenerizku/1,399 .
SFX 188 0 zeneriztakeen .
SFX 188 0 zeneriztakeen/1,403 .
SFX 188 0 zeneriztakee/1,399 .
SFX 188 0 zeneriztaketen .
SFX 188 0 zeneriztaketen/1,403 .
SFX 188 0 zeneriztakete .
SFX 188 0 zeneriztakete/1,401 .
SFX 188 0 zeneriztake .
SFX 188 0 zeneriztake/1,398 .
SFX 188 0 zeneriztan .
SFX 188 0 zeneriztan/1,403 .
SFX 188 0 zeneriztaten .
SFX 188 0 zeneriztaten/1,403 .
SFX 188 0 zeneriztate .
SFX 188 0 zeneriztate/1,399 .
SFX 188 0 zenerizta/1,399 .
SFX 188 0 zenerizt .
SFX 188 0 zenerizt/1,182 .
SFX 188 0 zeneroakeen .
SFX 188 0 zeneroakeen/1,403 .
SFX 188 0 zeneroakee/1,399 .
SFX 188 0 zeneroaketen .
SFX 188 0 zeneroaketen/1,403 .
SFX 188 0 zeneroakete .
SFX 188 0 zeneroakete/1,401 .
SFX 188 0 zeneroake .
SFX 188 0 zeneroake/1,398 .
SFX 188 0 zeneroan .
SFX 188 0 zeneroan/1,403 .
SFX 188 0 zeneroaten .
SFX 188 0 zeneroaten/1,403 .
SFX 188 0 zeneroate .
SFX 188 0 zeneroate/1,399 .
SFX 188 0 zeneroatzakeen .
SFX 188 0 zeneroatzakeen/1,403 .
SFX 188 0 zeneroatzakee/1,399 .
SFX 188 0 zeneroatzaketen .
SFX 188 0 zeneroatzaketen/1,403 .
SFX 188 0 zeneroatzakete .
SFX 188 0 zeneroatzakete/1,401 .
SFX 188 0 zeneroatzake .
SFX 188 0 zeneroatzake/1,398 .
SFX 188 0 zeneroatzan .
SFX 188 0 zeneroatzan/1,403 .
SFX 188 0 zeneroatzaten .
SFX 188 0 zeneroatzaten/1,403 .
SFX 188 0 zeneroatzate .
SFX 188 0 zeneroatzate/1,399 .
SFX 188 0 zeneroatza .
SFX 188 0 zeneroatza/1,399 .
SFX 188 0 zeneroa .
SFX 188 0 zeneroa/1,399 .
SFX 188 0 zenerrakeen .
SFX 188 0 zenerrakeen/1,403 .
SFX 188 0 zenerrakee/1,399 .
SFX 188 0 zenerraketen .
SFX 188 0 zenerraketen/1,403 .
SFX 188 0 zenerrakete .
SFX 188 0 zenerrakete/1,401 .
SFX 188 0 zenerrake .
SFX 188 0 zenerrake/1,398 .
SFX 188 0 zenerrate .
SFX 188 0 zenerrate/1,408 .
SFX 188 0 zenerra .
SFX 188 0 zenerra/1,408 .
SFX 188 0 zeneukakeen .
SFX 188 0 zeneukakeen/1,403 .
SFX 188 0 zeneukakee/1,399 .
SFX 188 0 zeneukaketen .
SFX 188 0 zeneukaketen/1,403 .
SFX 188 0 zeneukakete .
SFX 188 0 zeneukakete/1,401 .
SFX 188 0 zeneukake .
SFX 188 0 zeneukake/1,398 .
SFX 188 0 zeneukan .
SFX 188 0 zeneukan/1,403 .
SFX 188 0 zeneukaten .
SFX 188 0 zeneukaten/1,403 .
SFX 188 0 zeneukate .
SFX 188 0 zeneukate/1,399 .
SFX 188 0 zeneuka .
SFX 188 0 zeneuka/1,399 .
SFX 188 0 zeneuzkakeen .
SFX 188 0 zeneuzkakeen/1,403 .
SFX 188 0 zeneuzkakee/1,399 .
SFX 188 0 zeneuzkaketen .
SFX 188 0 zeneuzkaketen/1,403 .
SFX 188 0 zeneuzkakete .
SFX 188 0 zeneuzkakete/1,401 .
SFX 188 0 zeneuzkake .
SFX 188 0 zeneuzkake/1,398 .
SFX 188 0 zeneuzkan .
SFX 188 0 zeneuzkan/1,403 .
SFX 188 0 zeneuzkaten .
SFX 188 0 zeneuzkaten/1,403 .
SFX 188 0 zeneuzkate .
SFX 188 0 zeneuzkate/1,399 .
SFX 188 0 zeneuzka .
SFX 188 0 zeneuzka/1,399 .
SFX 188 0 zenezaguen .
SFX 188 0 zenezaguen/1,403 .
SFX 188 0 zenezague/1,399 .
SFX 188 0 zenezagukete .
SFX 188 0 zenezagukete/1,401 .
SFX 188 0 zenezaguke .
SFX 188 0 zenezaguke/1,398 .
